Oklahoma, session 2025, SB379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 23 of Title 22, unless there is

created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. A person whose arrest booking photograph is published or

otherwise disseminated may make a request in writing to the business

or individual who published or otherwise disseminated the photograph

for the removal of the photograph. The written request for removal

of the arrest booking photograph shall be sent by registered mail

Req. No. 504 Page 1

and include sufficient proof of identification of the person whose

photograph was published and specific information identifying the

photograph the written request is seeking to remove.

B. 1. Within ten (10) days after receipt of the written

request for removal of the arrest booking photograph, the business

or individual who published or otherwise disseminated the photograph

shall remove the photograph and may not republish or otherwise

disseminate the photograph.

2. The person whose arrest booking photograph was published or

otherwise disseminated may bring a civil action to enjoin the

continued publication of the photograph if the business or

individual does not remove the arrest booking photograph within the

required time. The court shall award court costs and reasonable

attorney fees related to the issuance and enforcement of the

injunction and may impose a civil penalty of One Thousand Dollars

($1,000.00) per day for noncompliance. Amounts recovered from civil

penalties under this paragraph shall be deposited into the General

Revenue Fund.

3. If a business or individual is required to remove an arrest

booking photograph under this section and later republishes the

photograph, the person whose photograph is republished or otherwise

disseminated may bring a civil action to enjoin the continued

publication or dissemination of the photograph. The court shall

award court costs and reasonable attorney fees related to the

Req. No. 504 Page 2

issu ance and enforcement of the injunction and may impose a civil

penalty of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per day for

noncompliance. Amounts recovered from civil penalties under this

paragraph shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.

C. A business or individual engaged in the business of

publishing or otherwise disseminating arrest booking photographs of

persons who have been previously arrested may not solicit or accept

a fee or other form of payment for the removal of the photographs.

D. This section shall not apply to a business or individual

that publishes or disseminates information relating to arrest

booking photographs unless:

1. The business or individual solicits or accepts payment for

the removal of photographs; or

2. The business or individual’s primary business model is the

publishing and disseminating of arrest booking photographs for a

commercial purpose or pecuniary gain.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-504 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:45 PM











Req. No. 504 Page 3